North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 39. Guardian Ad Litem Program. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-489 through 7A-493.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5, effective July 1, 1999.

Cross References.

For the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-100

et seq.

For guardian ad litem program, see

G.S. 7B-1200

et seq.